Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Cross references. —

As to grant of school lands generally by Act of Admission, see Act of Adm., § 4.

As to sale or lease of school lands under Act of Admission, see Act of Adm., § 5.

As to common school fund from proceeds of sales of public lands under Act of Admission, see Act of Adm., § 7.

As to university lands under Act of Admission, see Act of Adm., § 8.

As to agricultural college lands under Act of Admission, see Act of Adm., § 10.

As to constitutional right to education, see art. 1, § 23, Wyo. Const.

As to educational qualifications of electors, see art. 6, § 9, Wyo. Const.

As to providing complete and uniform system of public instruction, see art. 7, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to school funds, see art. 7, §§ 2 to 9, Wyo. Const.

For prohibition against discrimination between pupils on account of sex, race or color, see art. 7, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to prescribing textbooks, see art. 7, § 11, Wyo. Const.

For prohibition against sectarian education, see art. 7, § 12, Wyo. Const.

As to general supervision of public schools, see art. 7, § 14, Wyo. Const.

As to University of Wyoming, see art. 7, §§ 15 to 17, Wyo. Const.

As to fixing salaries of school officers, see art. 14, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to collection of fees by school officers, see art. 14, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to limits on tax levy for support of public schools, see art. 15, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to disposition of unexpended income of perpetual school fund, see art. 18, § 6, Wyo. Const.

As to providing public school system open to all children and free from sectarian control, see art. 21, § 28, Wyo. Const.

As to partition of land acquired for church and school purposes, see §

1-32-121

.

As to closing of schools on public legal holidays, see §

8-4-101

.

As to commemorating Arbor Day in schools, see §

8-4-102

.

As to observing Wyoming Day in the schools, see §

8-4-103

.

For Interstate Library Compact, see §

9-2-1026

.8.

As to state telecommunications council, see §

9-2-1026

.2.

As to retirement of state employees and teachers, see §

9-3-401

et seq.

As to university building account, see §

9-4-306

.

As to university account, see §

9-4-308

.

As to accounts within permanent land fund and permanent land income fund, see §

9-4-310

.

As to apportionment of forest reserve funds for benefit of public schools and roads, see §§

9-4-501

through

9-4-504

.

As to use of government royalty income for public school construction, see §

9-4-601

et seq.

As to use for public schools of grants, gifts, devises, escheats and forfeitures to the state, see §§

9-5-201

through

9-5-205

.

As to duty of county clerk to issue certificates relating to selection or relinquishment of school lands, see § 18-3-402(a)(xiv).

As to county libraries, see §§

18-7-101

through

18-7-106

.

As to archaeological, geological and historical museums, see §§

18-10-101

through

18-10-105

.

As to day care centers, see §

18-13-101

.

As to free tuition and fees for education of war orphans, see §

19-14-106

.

As to liability of property of husband or wife for education of children, see §

20-1-201

.

As to applicability of Election Code to school and community college district elections, see §

22-2-101

.

As to ballots in school and community college district elections, see §

22-6-128

.

As to school and community college elections generally, see §§

22-22-101

through

22-22-304

.

For Training School Act of 1981, see §§

25-5-101

through

25-5-134

.

As to employment of children of school age, see §§

27-6-107

through

27-6-114

.

As to validation of gifts, devises, bequests or conveyances for educational, etc., uses, see §§

34-5-114

through

34-5-117

.

As to sanitation of public institutions such as schools, see §

35-1-102

.

As to sanitary standards for schools, see §

35-1-240

.

As to joint committee on schools health, see §§

35-1-701

,

35-1-702

.

As to fire escapes in schools and universities, see §§

35-9-501

through

35-9-507

.

As to acceptance of school lands, see §

36-1-104

.

As to preference to holder of lease of school land under Taylor Grazing Act, see §

36-5-107

.

As to mineral leases of school lands, see §§

36-6-101

through

36-6-103

.

As to terms of payment for school lands, see §

36-9-107

.

As to exemption of transportation of children to and from school from provisions as to motor carriers, see §

31-18-103

.

As to levying taxes for school purposes, see §

39-13-104

.

Severability. —

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 290, Laws 1977, ch. 19, § 2, Laws 1977, ch. 169, § 2, and Laws 1977, ch. 175, § 2, declare the provisions of the acts to be severable.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Education Code of 1969,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1970).

For article, “Financing Wyoming's Public Schools: The Wyoming Legislature Gets to Try Again,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 469 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities § 1 et seq.; 68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools § 1 et seq.

Construction and application of agreement by medical or social work student to work in particular position or at particular location in exchange for financial aid in meeting costs of education, 83 ALR3d 1273.

Admissibility of school records under hearsay exceptions, 57 ALR4th 1111.

Liability of school or school personnel in connection with suicide of student, 17 ALR5th 179.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents occurring in physical education classes, 66 ALR5th 1.

Tort liability of schools and institutions of higher learning for personal injury suffered during school field trip, 68 ALR5th 519.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents occurring during school athletic events, 68 ALR5th 663.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for injury to student walking to or from school, 72 ALR5th 469.

Action of private institution of higher education as constituting state action, or action under color of law, for purposes of fourteenth amendment and 42 U.S.C. § 1983, 37 ALR Fed 601.

Effects of federal non-interference with curriculum statute (20 USC § 1232a), 71 ALR Fed 588.

Circumstances warranting judicial determination or declaration of unitary status with regard to schools operating under court-ordered or -supervised desegregation plans and the effects of such declarations, 94 ALR Fed 667.

Giving of invocation with religious content at public-school-sponsored events to which public is invited or admitted as violation of establishment clause of first amendment, 98 ALR Fed 206.

Applicability and application of § 2 of Voting Rights Act of 1965 (42 USC § 1973) to members of school board, 105 ALR Fed 254.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities § 1 et seq.; 78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts § 1 et seq.